Tennessee statutes. Title 38 Prevention And Detection Of Crime
Part 3

Statutory Rape Prevention

38-1-301. Purpose of part.

The purpose of this part is to curtail the crime of statutory rape, to require the reporting of a condition believed to be indicative of statutory rape, and, being necessary for the health, peace and safety of the public, to protect minors in a specified age range, who are not legally competent to consent to sex, from rape.

Acts 1996, ch. 842, § 1.

Cross-References. Child sexual abuse, title 37, ch. 1, part 6.

Statutory rape, § 39-13-506.

38-1-302. Report of pregnancy and identity of alleged father to judge or law enforcement official.

If, during any treatment or examination of any child less than eighteen (18) years of age, a determination is made that the child is pregnant, and if it is learned during the course of the treatment or examination that the alleged father is at least four (4) years older than, but not the legal spouse of the victim, in accordance with § 39-13-506, the doctor, physician, surgeon, health care provider or other person examining or treating the child or diagnosing the condition is encouraged to, upon obtaining the consent of the patient, a parent, legal guardian or custodian, and within twenty-four (24) hours of the time of the treatment, examination or diagnosis, report the pregnancy by telephone or otherwise, to the judge having juvenile jurisdiction or to the office of sheriff or the chief law enforcement official of the municipality where the child resides.

Injuries to minors that are required to be reported by § 37-1-403 are not required to be reported under this part.

Acts 1996, ch. 842, § 1.

38-1-303. Contents of report.

The report may include, to the extent known by the doctor, physician, surgeon, health care provider or other person filing the report, the name, address and age of the child; the name, address and age of the alleged father; the alleged father's whereabouts at the time the report is made; the results of the diagnosis; and the facts requiring the report. The report may include any other pertinent information.

Acts 1996, ch. 842, § 1.

38-1-304. Confidentiality of reports and identities.

Reports made under this part, and the identity of the person filing the report, are confidential, except when the court having jurisdiction determines the testimony of the person reporting to be material to an indictment or conviction.

Acts 1996, ch. 842, § 1.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

38-1-305. Notice of statutory rape from public assistance providers to law enforcement agencies.

When a person who is at least thirteen (13) years of age but less than eighteen (18) years of age, or a parent, legal guardian or custodian on behalf of such person, applies to the department of human services for child support services, temporary assistance for needy families (TANF) or any other program designed to provide similar public assistance, and the department determines from the application, or during the course of any interview with the applicant, that the father or alleged father of the child is at least four (4) years older than such child's mother, the department shall report such information indicating the occurrence of a possible statutory rape to the appropriate law enforcement agency and district attorney general.

Acts 1996, ch. 842, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Temporary assistance for needy families (TANF), referred to in this section, is compiled at 42. U.S.C. § 601 et seq.

Cross-References. Temporary assistance for children and families, title 71, ch. 3, part 1.

38-1-306. Immunity of persons making reports.

Any person making a report under this part shall be immune from civil liability that might otherwise be imposed for such action.

Acts 1996, ch. 842, § 2.

Cross-References. Child sexual abuse, immunity, §§ 37-1-610, 37-1-613.

Child support enforcement, immunity, § 36-5-810.

Uniform Interstate Family Support Act, immunity § 36-5-2504.